Maine, session 132, LD215.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §4305, sub-§3-E is enacted to read:
3-E. Maximum levels of assistance for large recovery residences. Municipalities
shall establish maximum levels of assistance for housing assistance provided to or on behalf
of a person residing in a recovery residence, as described in section 4309, subsection 6,
with occupancy of 26 or more beds, in an amount equal to 70% of the maximum levels of
assistance for recovery residences with occupancy of 25 or fewer beds.
Sec. 2. 22 MRSA §4311, sub-§1-D is enacted to read:
1-D. Reimbursement for large recovery residences. The department shall
reimburse each municipality for housing assistance provided to or on behalf of a person
residing in a recovery residence, as described in section 4309, subsection 6, with occupancy
of 26 or more beds, in an amount equal to 100% of housing assistance granted to that
individual.
Sec. 3. Department to convene stakeholder group; report. The Department of
Health and Human Services shall convene a stakeholder group of interested parties,
including, but not limited to, individuals in recovery, operators of recovery residences,
municipal officials and individuals representing the entity responsible for the certification
of recovery residences in the State to review options for managing the costs of general
assistance provided for residents of recovery residences, including possible expansion or
creation of state-funded subsidy programs. The department shall report its findings by
February 1, 2026 to the Joint Standing Committee on Health and Human Services. The
committee may report out legislation related to the report to the Second Regular Session of
the 132nd Legislature or to any special session of the 132nd Legislature.
Page 1 - 132LR0070(11)